Maryland, session 2026, HB0010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
1–113.
(a) Unless otherwise provided, in a law, resolution, or court order, judgment, or
decree that refers to publishing a legal advertisement or legal notice, words such as
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0010*

HOUSE BILL 10
“newspaper” or “newspaper in general circulation” mean a PRINT OR AND DIGITAL
publication OR DIGITAL–ONLY PUBLICATION THAT COVERS LOCAL NEWS OR
INFORMATION IN MORE THAN THREE COUNTIES IN THE STATE that:
(1) [has at least four pages;
(2)] habitually contains news items, reports of current events, editorial
comments, advertising matter, and other miscellaneous information that is of public
interest and is found generally in an ordinary newspaper;
[(3)] (2) has been published and distributed, by sale, from an established
place of business at least once a week for 6 months or more before publication of the
advertisement or notice;
[(4)] (3) has general circulation throughout the community where the
publication is published; [and
(5)] (4) FOR A PRINT PUBLICATION:
(I) qualifies for Periodicals rates for mailing through the United
States Postal Service; AND
(II) HAS AT LEAST FOUR PAGES; AND
(5) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, FOR A DIGITAL
PUBLICATION:
(I) EMPLOYS OR RETAINS ONE OR MORE PERSONS TO CREATE,
EDIT, PRODUCE, AND DISTRIBUTE ORIGINAL CONTENT CONCERNING MATTERS OF
PUBLIC INTEREST THROUGH REPORTING ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING CONDUCTING
INTERVIEWS, OBSERVING CURRENT EVENTS, AND REVIEWING DOCUMENTS OR
OTHER INFORMATION;
(II) EMPLOYS AT LEAST ONE INDIVIDUAL FULL TIME, WORKING
AT LEAST 30 HOURS PER WEEK, WHO:
1. RESIDES WITHIN 50 MILES OF THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION WHERE THE LEGAL ADVERTISEMENT OR LEGAL NOTICE
IS REQUIRED TO BE PUBLISHED; AND
2. GATHERS, PREPARES, COLLECTS, PHOTOGRAPHS,
WRITES, EDITS, REPORTS, OR PUBLISHES ORIGINAL LOCAL OR STATE NEWS FOR
DISTRIBUTION IN THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION;

HOUSE BILL 10 3
(III) PUBLISHES AT LEAST ONE ARTICLE PER WEEK CONCERNING
MATTERS OF PUBLIC INTEREST FOR THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12 MONTHS; AND
(IV) IF DESIGNATED AS A TAX–EXEMPT ORGANIZATION UNDER §
501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE:
1. DECLARES IN ITS INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE
FILINGS THAT ITS MISSION INCLUDES THE COVERAGE OF LOCAL OR STATE NEWS;
AND
2. HAS NOT RECEIVED MORE THAN 50% OF ITS GROSS
RECEIPTS DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR FROM:
A. POLITICAL ACTION COMMITTEES OR OTHER ENTITIES
DESCRIBED IN § 527 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; OR
B. ORGANIZATIONS THAT ARE DESIGNATED AS
TAX–EXEMPT UNDER § 501(C)(4), (5), OR (6) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, A DIGITAL
PUBLICATION THAT PUBLISHES A LEGAL ADVERTISEMENT OR LEGAL NOTICE
SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN AN ARCHIVE OF ALL PUBLISHED LEGAL
ADVERTISEMENTS AND LEGAL NOTICES THAT SHALL BE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC;
AND
(2) BE ACCESSIBLE IN THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
THAT IS REQUIRED TO PUBLISH THE LEGAL ADVERTISEMENT OR LEGAL NOTICE.
(C) FOR PURPOSES OF THE PUBLIC GENERAL LAWS OF THE STATE, IF A
LAW, RESOLUTION, COURT ORDER, JUDGMENT, OR DECREE REQUIRES A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION TO PUBLISH A LEGAL ADVERTISEMENT OR LEGAL
NOTICE IN A PRINT OR DIGITAL NEWSPAPER IN GENERAL CIRCULATION, THE TIME
PERIOD REQUIRED FOR PUBLICATION BEGINS ON THE DATE THE FIRST
ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE APPEARS IN PRINT OR DIGITAL FORMAT.
[(b)] (D) Subject to subsection (a) of this section and for purposes of the public
general laws of the State, in Prince George’s County, “newspaper in general circulation”
includes a newspaper that:
(1) is designated by the County Council as a newspaper of record; or

HOUSE BILL 10
(2) (i) qualifies under subsection (a) of this section with respect to
Prince George’s County; and
(ii) is published by a small business as defined in § 14–201 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
[(c) Subject to subsection (a) of this section and for purposes of the public general
laws of the State, in Dorchester County, if a law, resolution, or court order, judgment, or
decree requires the county to publish a legal advertisement or legal notice:
(1) any required advertisement or notice shall be published and distributed
through print and digital format;
(2) the time period required for publication starts once the first
advertisement or notice appears in print or digital format; and
(3) if there is no print and digital publication that meets all of the
qualifications under subsection (a) of this section, the advertisement or notice may be
placed in any digital publication that can be accessed in Dorchester County and that
regularly contains local news and information for Dorchester County.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.